Louisiana, session 2026, SB347.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3399.12(5) and 3399.16(A), (B), and (C) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§3399.12. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(5) "Power-based violence" means any form of interpersonal violence
conduct intended to control, coerce, harm, exploit or intimidate another person on
the basis of sex through the assertion of power or authority over the person and
which shall include the following:
(a) Dating violence (R.S. 46:2151).
(b) Any conduct prohibited by R.S. 14:73.13 or 73.14, or any successor
statute, involving media generated by artificial intelligence or deepfake media
depicting sexual imagery.
(b)(c) Domestic abuse and family violence (R.S. 46:2121.1 and 2132). For
the purposes of this Part, domestic abuse shall also include any act or threat to act
that is intended to coerce, control, punish, intimidate, or exact revenge on the other
party, for the purpose of preventing the victim from reporting to law enforcement or
requesting medical assistance or emergency victim services, or for the purpose of
depriving the victim of the means or ability to resist the abuse or escape the
relationship.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 347 ENROLLED
(c)(d) Nonconsensual observation of another person's sexuality without the
other person's consent, including voyeurism (R.S. 14:283.1), video voyeurism (R.S.
14:283), nonconsensual disclosure of a private image (R.S. 14:283.2), and peeping
tom activities (R.S. 14:284).
(d)(e) Sexual assault (R.S. 14:41, 42 through 43.5, 89, 89.1, and 106).
(e)(f) "Sexual exploitation" which means an act attempted or committed by
a person for sexual gratification, financial gain, or other advancement through the
abuse of another person's sexuality including prostituting another person (R.S.
14:46.2 and 82 through 86).
(f)(g) "Sexual harassment" which means unwelcome sexual advances,
requests for sexual favors, and other verbal, physical, or inappropriate conduct of a
sexual nature when the conduct explicitly or implicitly affects an individual's
employment or education, unreasonably interferes with an individual's work or
educational performance, or creates an intimidating, hostile, or offensive work or
educational environment and has no legitimate relationship to the subject matter of
a course or academic research.
(g)(h) Stalking (R.S. 14:40.2) and cyberstalking (R.S. 14:40.3).
(h)(i) Unlawful communications (R.S. 14:285(A)(1) and (4)).
(i)(j) Unwelcome sexual or sex- or gender-based conduct that is objectively
offensive, has a discriminatory intent, and lacks a bona fide academic purpose.
* * *
§3399.16. Safety education; recognition and reporting of potential threats to safety
A. Not later than the beginning of the fall semester of 2022 2026, the
administration of each institution, in consultation with campus or local law
enforcement agencies, shall develop and distribute, not less than four times per
academic year through in-person or online delivery or both, information to
students regarding power-based violence, campus safety, and internet and cell phone
safety and online content that is a potential threat to school safety.
B. The information shall include the following:
(1) Instruction on how to identify and the identification, prevent prevention,
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 347 ENROLLED
dangers, and prohibition of power-based violence and how to detect potential
threats to school safety exhibited online, including on any social media platform.
(2) How to report incidents of power-based violence, crimes on campus,
violations of the student code of conduct, and possible threats to campus safety.
(3) Where to find reports regarding campus safety.
(4) The information required in this Subsection shall be updated in
consultation with campus or local law enforcement.
C.(1) The information shall be distributed as part of new student orientation
and shall be posted on an easily accessible page of each institution's website.
(2) If the student receiving the information required by Subsections B
and C of this Section is a minor, the information shall also be provided to his
parent or legal guardian.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.